Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3550
Hospital district; board; membership in organization; dues.

The board of directors may maintain membership in any local, state or national group or association organized and operated for the promotion of the public health and welfare or the advancement of the efficiency of hospital administration, and in connection therewith pay dues and fees thereto.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 23, p. 382;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.42.